Arkansas, session 2025, HB1121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 22-6-501 is repealed.
22-6-501. Transfer to state institutions.
(a)(1) The Commissioner of State Lands is authorized upon application
of the director of any state department or agency, the management or the
board of trustees of any state institution, or the chief executive of any
county, city, or school district of this state to issue to the applying
governmental unit a deed for land listed on the Commissioner of State Lands'
records as having been forfeited for the nonpayment of taxes.
(2) The application shall include the following:
(A) The proposed use of the land;
(B) The proposed duration for the stated use; and
(C) The division or department designated for the
maintenance and operation of the property once deeded. Moreover, the
Commissioner of State Lands is authorized to accept the application as
submitted or recommend modifications to the application. The Commissioner of
State Lands is further empowered to disallow any application determined by
*LGL028*
01-27-2025 09:10:04 LGL028

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 HB1121
the Commissioner of State Lands to be contrary to the best interests of the
health and general welfare of the state and its citizens.
(b)(1) The deed issued by the Commissioner of State Lands to a state
department or agency, state institution, city, county, or school district may
contain restrictive covenants or reservations stating that should the
governmental unit no longer desire to use the land for the proposed use
stated in the application, said governmental unit shall submit a subsequent
letter of application to the Commissioner of State Lands to request change in
the use of the property, and the Commissioner of State Lands shall accept,
modify, or disallow the request.
(2) Moreover, should the governmental unit determine that the
property can no longer be utilized, the property shall revert to the state,
be held by the Commissioner of State Lands, and be treated as tax-forfeited
land subject to the powers and authority of the Commissioner of State Lands.
(3) Because this section applies to the disposition of tax-
forfeited land, § 22-6-601 shall not apply herewith.
(c) No consideration shall be required for the transfer except the fee
of one dollar ($1.00) as required by law.
(d)(1) All deeds granted by the Commissioner of State Lands prior to
the passage of this section are confirmed, and the title of all purchases
under the deeds from the Commissioner of State Lands are quieted,
established, and confirmed.
(2) Collection of any outstanding ad valorem property tax
indebtedness shall be stayed by the Commissioner of State Lands while title
to the property remains with the governmental unit.
(3) Should the property revert to the state pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, the property may be sold as prescribed by the
Commissioner of State Lands.
(e)(1) Land donated by the Commissioner of State Lands under this
section may be used for any lawful purpose or transferred pursuant to any
lawful authority of the city or town.
(2) Owners of property donated to a city or town under this
section shall not have any right to retain any of the appraised value of the
property.
(f) Prior to conveyance of property, the Commissioner of State Lands
may give consideration to the following issues:
01-27-2025 09:10:04 LGL028

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 HB1121
(1) Whether the prospective purchaser has a pattern or practice
of not paying fines resulting from a citation for violation of state laws or
rules or local codes and ordinances;
(2) Whether the prospective purchaser has a pattern or practice
of not timely paying property taxes; and
(3) Whether the prospective purchaser was the prior owner of
real property that was transferred to the Commissioner of State Lands as a
result of tax delinquency during the preceding three (3) years.

/s/Long


























01-27-2025 09:10:04 LGL028